test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-76puegaemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pügämä: # Verb (76) pügämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pügämä+V+Inf/mA: pügämä
     pügämä+V+Inf: pükäq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: pöet

     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: püä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: püät
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pügä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: püämiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: püätiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pügäväq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: püä-äiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: püäq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: püä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pöi
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pöit
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pügi
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pöimiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pöitiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pöiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: püä-äs


     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pükäv

     pügämä+V+Jus: pügäguq

     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pöedä
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pöetät
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pöetäs
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pöetämiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pöetätiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pöetäseq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: pöedä-äiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: pöedäq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: pöedä

     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pöedi
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pöetit
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pöeti
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pöetimiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pöetitiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pöediq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: pöedä-äs

     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pükäv
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pügävä
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: pügävät
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pügävähe
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pügäväq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pügävide
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: pügävit
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pügävihe

     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pöetäv
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pöetävä
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: pöetävät
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pöetävähe
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pöetäväq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pöetävide
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: pöetävit
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pöetävihe

     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: pügänü
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: pügänüt
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pügänühe
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: pügänüide
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: pügänüid
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: pügänüihe

     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pöet
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: pöedü
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: pöetüt
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pöetühe
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pöedüq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: pöetüide
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: pöetüid
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: pöetüihe
